Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.255

Deferral or suspension of sentences—Probation—Maximum term—Transfer to another state.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, judges of the municipal court, in their discretion, shall have the power in all criminal proceedings within their jurisdiction including violations of city ordinances, to defer imposition of any sentence, suspend all or part of any sentence including installment payment of fines, fix the terms of any such deferral or suspension, and provide for such probation as in their opinion is reasonable and necessary under the circumstances of the case, but in no case shall it extend for more than five years from the date of conviction for a defendant to be sentenced for a domestic violence offense or under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years from the date of conviction for all other offenses. A defendant who has been sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then fails to appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance with the terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall have the term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or her presence known to the court on the record. However, the jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. Any time before entering an order terminating probation, the court may modify or revoke its order suspending or deferring the imposition or execution of the sentence. For the purposes of this subsection, "domestic violence offense" means a crime listed in RCW 10.99.020 that is not a felony offense.

(2)(a) If a defendant whose sentence has been deferred requests permission to travel or transfer to another state, the director of probation services or a designee thereof shall determine whether such request is subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult offender supervision. If such request is subject to the compact, the director or designee shall:

(i) Notify the department of corrections of the defendant's request;

(ii) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;

(iii) Notify the defendant of the fee due to the department of corrections for processing an application under the compact;

(iv) Cease supervision of the defendant while another state supervises the defendant pursuant to the compact;

(v) Resume supervision if the defendant returns to this state before the period of deferral expires.

(b) The defendant shall receive credit for time served while being supervised by another state.

(c) If the probationer is returned to the state at the request of the receiving state under rules of the interstate compact for adult offender supervision, the department of corrections is responsible for the cost of returning the probationer.

(d) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its employees, and any city and its employees are not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission authorized or required under this section unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence.

(3) Judges of the municipal court shall not defer sentence for an offense sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 7; 2010 c 274 s 407; 2005 c 400 s 5; 2001 c 94 s 3; 1999 c 56 s 3; 1983 c 156 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 147 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 c 274: See note following RCW 10.31.100.

Application—Effective date—2005 c 400: See notes following RCW 9.94A.74504.